Wyoming statutes. Title 19 Defense Forces and Affairs
Article 3. Officers and Enlisted Personnel; Generally

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status of military enlistment contract, 62 ALR Fed 860.

§ 19-9-301.
National guard officers generally.

All officers of the national guard of Wyoming shall be appointed by the governor of Wyoming as provided in national guard regulations except such officers as may be commissioned by the governor in an honorary status or in a state status without regard to their allocation or qualification by the department of defense of the United States.

All officers appointed in the national guard of Wyoming except the adjutant general, assistant adjutants general and additional general officers shall hold their membership until they have reached seventy (70) years of age unless retired or discharged prior to that time. No officer possesses a property interest in any duty position. The adjutant general is the discharge authority for all officers except the adjutant general, for which the governor shall be that authority. Any officer may be discharged from the Wyoming national guard according to procedures established by orders and regulations prescribed or promulgated by the adjutant general or according to federal law and regulation. An officer discharged from the United States air force or army reserves or who has his federal recognition withdrawn shall also be discharged from the Wyoming national guard effective as of the date of discharge from the reserves or withdrawal of federal recognition.

Initial appointments and promotions shall be made from the best qualified officers available for service in a unit or organization. The adjutant general shall for federal promotions and as required by federal regulation, submit recommendations personally or through a federal recognition board appointed by the adjutant general. For state promotion of officers, the adjutant general shall be the promotion authority.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 19, § 2.

The moral character, capacity and general fitness for the service of any national guard officer may be determined at any time by an administrative board as provided by applicable law and regulations. Commissions of officers of the national guard may be vacated upon resignation or absence without leave for three (3) months upon the recommendation of an administrative board or pursuant to sentence of a courts-martial.

The compensation of all officers when on duty by order of the governor shall be the same as paid to officers of like grade in the regular armed forces of the United States including longevity pay and allowances for federal and national guard service.

Within ten (10) days of his appointment an officer shall take and subscribe the oath provided in national guard regulations and the oath provided by the Wyoming constitution for all state officers. The officer who administers the oaths shall certify the facts and transmit the oaths or affirmations properly sealed and attested to the adjutant general, who shall file the same. A commission signed by the governor and countersigned by the adjutant general under seal of the adjutant general’s office shall then be issued to all officers qualified as provided for in national guard regulations, to take rank from date of original appointment. The rank of all officers now in the service or hereafter commissioned shall date from date of taking the oath of office.

The resignation of officers shall be addressed to the governor and transmitted to the adjutant general through the regular military channels. All commanding officers before forwarding a resignation shall endorse thereon their approval or disapproval, together with all facts bearing on the case. An officer tendering his resignation shall not be considered out of the service until his resignation is accepted. Upon acceptance of the resignation of a commissioned officer, the adjutant general with the approval of the governor, shall issue termination orders.

Repealed by Laws 2003, ch. 19, § 2.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, §§ 2, 3, 7, 9 to 12; 1939, ch. 21, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 73-102, 73-103, 73-107, 73-109 to 73-112; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-102, 30-103, 30-104, 30-108, 30-110 to 30-113; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-56 to 19-59, 19-61 to 19-64, 19-78.13; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 13; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-301

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3; 1999, ch. 138, § 1; 2003, ch. 19, §§ 1, 2; 2017 ch. 45, § 1, effective February 17, 2017.

Cross references. —

For oath of office, see art. 6, § 20, Wyo. Const.

As to rights and duties of guard members, see §

19-9-401

et seq.

The 2017 amendment,

in the first sentence of (b), inserted “and additional general officers,” and made a related change.

Laws 2017, ch. 45, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
Art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Removal of adjutant general under former § 19-56. —

See State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 401 P.2d 954,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Wyo. 1965); State ex rel. Pearson v. Hansen, 409 P.2d 769,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1966).

Termination. —

Under an exception to the Feres doctrine, Wyoming's Air National Guard and its adjutant general faced possible liability for terminating an officer without following all prescribed statutory procedures; state courts lacked subject matter jurisdiction, however, because of the officer's failure to timely seek review of the decision of the National Guard, since the Guard was, to at least some extent, a state agency. Nyberg v. State Military Dep't, 2003 WY 43, 65 P.3d 1241,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 2003).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to militiamen, 18 ALR2d 268.

§ 19-9-302.
Enlistments; oath; term; reenlistments and extensions; discharge.

After the forming of an organization, recruits may be enlisted into the organization. They shall sign their names to an enlistment contract to be furnished by the adjutant general for that purpose and signing is legal enlistment. Every commissioned officer and every noncommissioned officer at military pay grade E-9 as defined by federal rule and regulation, may administer the oath required on enlistment.

Every enlisted member shall serve for a term of years prescribed by department of defense orders or national guard regulations unless he is properly discharged.

All reenlistments and extensions shall be for the term prescribed by department of defense orders or national guard regulations.

Upon expiration of the service of any enlisted member or upon his discharge under United States department of defense or national guard regulation, the commanding officer of his organization shall prepare a discharge certificate as provided by federal or national guard regulation.

The adjutant general is the discharge authority for all enlisted members. An enlisted member may be discharged from the Wyoming national guard according to regulations adopted by the adjutant general or by federal law and regulation.

An enlisted member discharged from the United States air force or army reserves shall be discharged from the Wyoming national guard effective as of the date of discharge from the reserves.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, §§ 6, 15, 16; 1937, ch. 134, § 1; R.S. 1931, §§ 73-106, 73-115, 73-116; C.S. 1945, §§ 30-107, 30-116, 30-117, 30-133; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-65 to 19-67, 19-69, 19-78.14; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 14; 1971, ch. 67, § 1; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; 1994, ch. 15, § 308; 1996, ch. 1, § 336; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-302

; Laws 1998, ch. 30, § 321; ch. 99, § 3; 2003, ch. 19, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to rights and duties of guard members, see §

19-9-401

et seq.

For oath of office, see art. 6, § 20, Wyo. Const.

Salaries.

Sections 386, 387, C.S. 1920, specifying salaries of officers and enlisted men of national guard during encampments, did not provide a continuing appropriation, it being contemplated that each legislature should appropriate sufficient to meet the obligation. State ex rel. Davis v. Carter, 31 Wyo. 401, 226 P. 690,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 1924).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Enlistment or mustering of minors, 36 ALR2d 1018.

Validity of governmental requirement of oath of allegiance or loyalty as applied to militiamen, 18 ALR2d 268.

Modern status of military enlistment contract, 62 ALR Fed 860.

What circumstances constitute laches barring federal judicial review of allegedly wrongful discharge from military service, 100 ALR Fed 821.

§ 19-9-303.
Laws applicable to military procedure and subjects.

On all military procedure and subjects arising in this state and not specifically covered by Wyoming law, the laws, regulations and orders of the department of defense shall apply unless specifically prohibited by published orders of the governor of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 15; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-303

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 4.

§ 19-9-304.
Uniforms and equipment.

The uniform and equipment of all officers and enlisted personnel of the national guard of Wyoming shall be as prescribed for the national guard in department of defense orders or national guard regulations.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 163, § 25; R.S. 1931, § 73-125; C.S. 1945, § 30-127; W.S. 1957, §§ 19-31, 19-78.16; Laws 1969, ch. 72, § 16; 1977, ch. 138, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

19-2-304

; Laws 1998, ch. 99, § 3.